Rhode Island statutes. Title 6 Commercial Law — General Regulatory Provisions
Chapter 38 Insulation Contracts

6-38-1.
Declaration of purpose.

Given increased public awareness in energy conservation and a concurrent increase in energy activity in the marketplace, the general assembly finds that to offer consumer protection to prospective purchasers of insulation products and of installation services of those products serves the public interest, and the general assembly further finds that the protection can be afforded by requiring that no insulation contractor shall install insulation in any existing residential, industrial, or commercial building without first providing the owner or lessee with a written contract which shall include, but not be limited to, the provisions of §

6-38-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1980, ch. 194, § 1.

6-38-2.
Definitions.

For the purpose of this chapter:

“Degree of flammability” means the rating of fire retardation of insulation products.

“Insulation” means any product made of either cellular, granular, fibrous, or formaldehyde-based or polyurethane-based material that, through gas-filled voids within these materials, is designed to retard the passage of heat through the ceiling, roof, walls, or floor of a structure.

“Insulation contractor” means any individual, firm, partnership, corporation, company, association, or joint stock association that advertises itself as, solicits as, or holds itself to be one that is primarily engaged in the business of installing insulation and that has gross receipts for the installation of insulation of two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) or more for all labor, or four thousand five hundred dollars ($4,500) or more for all materials in any one calendar year.

“Resistance factor” has the same meaning as “thermal resistance” as defined in the American Society of Heating, Refrigeration, and Air-conditioning Engineers (ASHRAE) Handbook of Fundamentals.

“Vapor barrier” means any material specifically designed or intended for the purpose of restricting the passage of moisture through walls and ceilings and designed or intended to protect a structure against mildew, rot, peeling paints, and a breakdown of insulation.

History of Section.

P.L. 1980, ch. 194, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 528, § 27.

6-38-3.
Contract requirements.

No insulation contractor shall install insulation in any existing residential, industrial, or commercial building without providing the owner or lessee, within a reasonable period of time prior to commencement of installation of insulation products, with a written contract. The contract, whether prepared by the contractor or on a form prepared by and available from the state of Rhode Island, shall clearly and conspicuously state, but not be limited to, the provisions of §

6-38-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1980, ch. 194, § 1.

6-38-4.
Contract provisions.

Contracts provided under the provisions of this chapter must include, but may not be limited to, the following:

The type of insulation as defined in §

6-38-2

, the manufacturer, and the commercial brand name, if any. Under this provision, any insulation contractor intending to install a ureaformaldehyde insulation product must conspicuously include within any contract required under the provisions of this chapter the following notice in its entirety:

“CAUTION: Under some conditions ureaformaldehyde insulation may cause the release of formaldehyde gas into living areas and the development of adverse health effects. Continued exposure to formaldehyde can cause nausea and vomiting, respiratory difficulties, headaches, eye irritation, and allergic reactions. The symptoms may develop anywhere from a few days to more than six (6) months after the gas is released. This notice of caution shall be acknowledged by the purchaser by signifying in an appropriate box that the purchaser has read and understands the nature and terms of the notice, provided, however, that the acknowledgment shall not constitute a waiver of any rights pursuant to the contract.”;

The resistance factor of the insulation per product inch and the thickness in inches of the insulation to be installed;

The degree of flammability of those properties. Under this provision, any insulation contractor intending to install a polyurethane-based insulation product must conspicuously include within any contract required under the provisions of this chapter the following notice in its entirety:

“NOTICE In the event of fire, a urethane-based product, if burned, can emit a highly toxic and deadly gas.”;

The area to be insulated as calculated in square feet, and a generic description of the area to be insulated, i.e., walls, roof, and/or floors;

The method by which the insulation contractor intends to install the insulation;

The type of ventilation to be installed in the insulated area. If no ventilation is to be installed, the contract must state this or must state that no ventilation is required and the reasons for the statement must be provided;

The type of vapor barrier to be installed. If no vapor barrier is to be installed, the contract must state this or must state that no vapor barrier is required and the reasons for the statement must be provided;

A guarantee against product settling or a statement as to the maximum percentage by which the insulation product can be expected to settle and over what period of time the settling can take place;

A detailed description of structural changes required to install insulation and an estimate of the cost of those changes. If no structural changes are required, the contract must state this;

A statement of the insulation contractor’s intent to complete all work necessary to restore the structure and surrounding area to its condition prior to commencement of installation of insulation;

The provisions of all product and installer warranties; and

The name, business address, and owner of the firm, partnership, corporation, company, association, or joint stock association providing the goods and services as described in the contract.

History of Section.

P.L. 1980, ch. 194, § 1; P.L. 1981, ch. 273, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 528, § 27.

6-38-5.
Penalties.

Any individual, firm, partnership, corporation, company, association, or joint stock association which violates any provision of this chapter shall be subject to a penalty of not less than five hundred dollars ($500), nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), for each and every offense. In addition to the penalties provided in this section, any violation of this chapter shall constitute a violation of the Deceptive Trades Practices Act (chapter 13.1 of title 6).

History of Section.

P.L. 1980, ch. 194, § 1.

6-38-6.
Enforcement.

Responsibility for enforcement of the provisions of this chapter shall be in the department of the attorney general.

History of Section.

P.L. 1980, ch. 194, § 1.

6-38-7.
Subsequent occupant or purchaser — Availability of installation information.

In the event of the sale or rental of a single or multifamily dwelling for which the owner or lessor has installed ureaformaldehyde insulation, the owner or lessor, upon request of a prospective purchaser, lessee, or tenant, shall provide any available information relative to the installed insulation.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 273, § 1.